Vermont statutes. Title 15A Adoption Act
Subchapter 2. General Procedural Provisions

§ 3-201.
Appointment of attorney or guardian ad litem.

In a proceeding under this title which may result in the termination of a relationship of parent and child, the court shall appoint an attorney for any person who is indigent, a minor, or incompetent who appears in the proceeding and whose parental relationship to a child may be terminated, unless the court finds that the minor or person who is incompetent has sufficient financial means to hire an attorney, or the person who is indigent declines to be represented by an attorney.

The court shall appoint a guardian ad litem for a minor adoptee in a contested proceeding under this title and may appoint a guardian ad litem for a minor adoptee in an uncontested proceeding.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2013, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 74.

§ 3-202.
[Reserved.]

§ 3-203.
Confidentiality of proceedings.

A civil proceeding under this title shall be heard in closed court. The court may admit persons not directly related to the proceedings on motion for good cause shown.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 3-204.
Custody during pendency of proceeding.

In order to protect the welfare of the minor, the court shall make an interim order for custody of a minor adoptee according to the best interests of the minor in a contested proceeding under this title for adoption or termination of a parental relationship and may make an interim order for custody in an uncontested proceeding.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 3-205.
Removal of adoptee from State.

Before a decree of adoption is issued, a petitioner may not remove a minor adoptee for more than 30 consecutive days from the state in which the petitioner resides without the permission of the court, if the minor was placed directly for adoption, or, if an agency placed the minor for adoption, the permission of the agency.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 3-206.
Joinder of termination action.

An action for termination of the legal relationship of parent and child pursuant to Part 5 of this article may be joined with a proceeding for adoption.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 3-207.
Consolidation and coordination.

If another action or proceeding concerning the adoptee is pending in the Family Division of the Superior Court of this State during the pendency of a proceeding for adoption under this title, then either court in which an action is pending, on its own motion or on motion of any party to the proceeding for adoption, may request that the proceeding for adoption be consolidated with the Family Division of the Superior Court proceeding. Such a consolidation may be ordered by the Family Division of the Superior Court receiving the adoption action, pursuant to

4 V.S.A. § 455

.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2009, No. 154

, § 238.

§ 3-208.
Use of initials.

If a person uses initials to keep the person’s identity confidential as provided for under any section in this title, the court may require that person to disclose his or her identity to another party to a proceeding under this title if the court finds that such disclosure is necessary in order for the other party to exercise his or her rights in the proceeding.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.